Utah statutes.
58-70a-503.   Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes:
(1)  violation of a patient confidence to any person who does not have a legal
right and a professional need to know the information concerning the patient;
(2)  knowingly prescribing, selling, giving away, or directly or indirectly
administering, or offering to prescribe, sell, furnish, give away, or
administer any prescription drug except for a legitimate medical purpose upon
a proper diagnosis indicating use of that drug in the amounts prescribed or
provided;
(3)  prescribing prescription drugs for himself or administering prescription
drugs to himself, except those that have been legally prescribed for him by a
licensed practitioner and that are used in accordance with the prescription
order for the condition diagnosed;
(4)  failure to maintain at the practice site a delegation of services
agreement that accurately reflects current practices; and
(5)  failure to make the delegation of services agreement available to the
division for review upon request.
